Alaska, session 34, SB232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 41.35.080 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 41.35.080. Research permits [PERMITS]. The commissioner may issue 05 a research permit for the investigation, excavation, gathering, or removal from the 06 natural state, of any historic, prehistoric, or archeological resources of the state. A 07 research permit may be issued only to persons or organizations qualified to make the 08 investigations, excavations, gatherings, or removals and only if the results of these 09 authorized activities will be made available to the general public through institutions 10 and museums interested in disseminating knowledge on the subjects involved. If the 11 historic, prehistoric, or archeological resource involved is one which is, or is located 12 on a site which is, sacred, holy, or of religious significance to a cultural group, the 13 consent of that cultural group must be obtained before a research permit may be 14 issued under this section. 15 * Sec. 2. AS 41.35 is amended by adding a new section to read: 01 Sec. 41.35.085. Personal use collection. (a) A person may collect certain 02 fossils for personal use on state land that is managed by the department other than a 03 state park or a state game refuge. Personal use collection is limited to a daily total of 04 25 pounds of certain fossils, 50 pounds of aggregate material that may contain certain 05 fossils, or one invertebrate fossil greater than 50 pounds. Personal use collection may 06 not be used for research purposes or for the collection of fossils that will be made 07 available to the general public through an institution or museum. Certain fossils 08 collected for personal use may not be sold or used for commercial purposes. 09 (b) A person engaging in personal use collection is responsible for ensuring 10 personal use collection occurs in an open area and that the certain fossils collected 11 meet the criteria for personal use collection under (a) of this section. 12 (c) When collecting fossils under this section, the person may use only hand 13 tools that are not electric or battery-powered and shall cause only minimal surface 14 disturbance. 15 * Sec. 3. AS 41.35.200(a) is amended to read: 16 (a) Except as provided in AS 41.35.085, a [A] person may not appropriate, 17 excavate, remove, injure, or destroy, without a permit from the commissioner, any 18 historic, prehistoric, or archeological resources of the state. 19 * Sec. 4. AS 41.35.230(2) is amended to read: 20 (2) "historic, prehistoric, and archeological resources" includes 21 deposits, structures, ruins, sites, buildings, graves, artifacts, fossils, fossilized tracks 22 or fossilized burrows, or other objects of antiquity which provide information 23 pertaining to the historical or prehistorical culture of people in the state as well as to 24 the natural history of the state. 25 * Sec. 5. AS 41.35.230 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 26 (3) "certain fossils" means plant fossils, invertebrate animal fossils, or 27 fossilized tracks from or fossilized burrows made by an invertebrate animal. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.